Idaho, session 2025, S1078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-904, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-904. STATE OFFICES -- VACANCIES, HOW FILLED AND CONFIRMED. (a) All
vacancies in any state office, and in the supreme and district courts, unless
otherwise provided for by law, shall be filled by appointment by the gover-
nor. Appointments to fill vacancies pursuant to this section shall be made
as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), (f) and (g) of this section,
subject to the limitations prescribed in those subsections.
(b) Nominations and appointments to fill vacancies occurring in the of-
fice of lieutenant governor, state controller, state treasurer, superinten-
dent of public instruction, attorney general and secretary of state shall be
made by the governor, subject to the advice and consent of the senate, for
the balance of the term of office to which the predecessor of the person ap-
pointed was elected.
(c) Nominations and appointments to and vacancies in the following
listed offices shall be made or filled by the governor subject to the advice
and consent of the senate for the terms prescribed by law, or in case such
terms are not prescribed by law, then to serve at the pleasure of the gover-
nor:
Director of the department of administration,
Director of the department of finance,
Director of the department of insurance,
Director, department of agriculture,
Director of the department of water resources,


Director of the Idaho state police,
Director of the Idaho transportation department,
Director of the department of commerce,
Director of the department of fish and game,
Director of the department of labor,
Director of the department of environmental quality,
Director of the department of juvenile corrections,
Director of the department of parks and recreation,
Director of the Idaho department of correction,
Executive director of the commission of pardons and parole,
The state historic preservation officer,
The administrator of the division of human resources,
Member of the state tax commission,
Members of the board of regents of the university of Idaho and the state
board of education,
Members of the Idaho water resource board,
Members of the state fish and game commission,
Members of the Idaho transportation board,
Voting members of the state board of health and welfare,
Members of the board of environmental quality,
Members of the board of directors of state parks and recreation,
Members of the board of correction,
Members of the industrial commission,
Members of the Idaho public utilities commission,
Members of the Idaho personnel commission,
Members of the board of directors of the Idaho state retirement system,
Members of the board of directors of the state insurance fund,
Members of the commission of pardons and parole.
(d) Appointments made by the state board of land commissioners to the
office of director, department of lands, and appointments to fill vacancies
occurring in those offices shall be submitted by the president of the state
board of land commissioners to the senate for the advice and consent of the
senate in accordance with the procedure prescribed in this section.
(e) Appointments made pursuant to this section while the senate is in
session shall be submitted along with the letter of appointment to the sen-
ate forthwith for the advice and consent of that body. Appointments made
pursuant to this section while the senate is not in session shall be submit-
ted along with the letter of appointment to the senate pursuant to section
67-803, Idaho Code. Should the senate adjourn without granting its consent
to an appointment the appointment shall thereupon become void and a vacancy
in the office to which the appointment was made shall exist, and the office
shall be deemed vacant upon the date of adjournment. It is the duty of the ap-
pointing authority to supply the senate with the letter of appointment. The
appointee shall supply the senate with the documentation it requests.
All appointments made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, ex-
cept those appointments for which a term of office is fixed by law, shall ter-
minate at the expiration of any gubernatorial term. Appointments to fill the
vacancies thus created by the expiration of the term of office of the gover-
nor shall be forthwith submitted to the senate for the advice and consent of


that body, and when so submitted shall be as expeditiously considered as pos-
sible.
Upon receipt of an appointment along with the letter of appointment in
the senate for the purpose of securing the advice and consent of the sen-
ate, the appointment shall be referred by the presiding officer to the appro-
priate committee of the senate for consideration and report prior to action
thereon by the full senate.
(f) Excepting the appointments made pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, whenever an appointee's term has expired as prescribed by law,
the governor or the authorized appointing authority must fill the position
within twelve (12) months of the expiration of the term. However, an of-
fice will be vacant if the governor or the authorized appointing authority:
(i) fails to timely appoint a qualified person at the earlier of the time
required by law or required in this subsection; or (ii) fails to provide
the senate with an appropriate letter or document of appointment by the
thirty-sixth legislative day of the subsequent legislative session. All
letters or documents of appointment must, as reasonably possible, accompany
the additional documentation required by the senate. At the request of the
secretary of the senate, the governor or the authorized appointing authority
must provide the additional documentation.
(g) It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of this sec-
tion as amended by this chapter shall not apply to appointments which have
been made prior to the effective date of this chapter. It is the further in-
tent of the legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply to
the offices listed in this section and to any office created by law or exec-
utive order which succeeds to the powers, duties, responsibilities and au-
thorities of any of the offices listed in subsections (c) and (d) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2. That Section 20-217A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
20-217A. APPOINTMENT OF DIRECTOR -- SALARY -- TERM -- POWERS AND DU-
TIES. The board Pursuant to the provisions of section 59-904, Idaho Code, the
governor shall appoint a director of correction, referred to in this chapter
as the director, of the Idaho state penitentiary whose salary shall be de-
termined and set by the board. The director shall be appointed for a term of
four (4) years. A director appointed on or before July 1, 2025, shall be con-
sidered for confirmation by the senate at the second regular session of the
sixty-eighth Idaho legislature. The director shall be the chief administra-
tive officer for the board and business manager of the penitentiary and the
properties used in connection therewith. The director shall assume all the
authority, powers, functions, and duties as may be delegated to him the di-
rector by the board.
SECTION 3. That Section 36-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-106. DIRECTOR OF DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. (a) Office of Di-
rector Created. The commission governor shall appoint a director of the
department of fish and game, hereinafter referred to as the director, who


pursuant to the provisions of section 59-904, Idaho Code. The director shall
be appointed to a four (4) year term. A director appointed on or before July
1, 2025, shall be considered for confirmation by the senate at the second
regular session of the sixty-eighth Idaho legislature. The director shall
be a person with knowledge of, and experience in, the requirements for the
protection, conservation, restoration, and management of the wildlife re-
sources of the state. The director shall not hold any other public office,
nor any office in any political party organization, and shall devote his en-
tire time to the service of the state in the discharge of his official duties,
under the direction of the commission.
(b) Secretary to Commission. The director or his designee shall serve
as secretary to the commission.
(c) Compensation and Expenses. The director shall receive such compen-
sation as the commission, with the concurrence and approval of the governor,
may determine and shall be reimbursed at the rate provided by law for state
employees for all actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred
by him in the discharge of his official duties.
(d) Oath and Bond. Before entering upon the duties of his office, the
director shall take and subscribe to the official oath of office, as provided
by section 59-401, Idaho Code, and shall, in addition thereto, swear and af-
firm that he holds no other public office, nor any position under any polit-
ical committee or party. Such oath, or affirmation, shall be signed in the
office of the secretary of state.
The director shall be bonded to the state of Idaho in the time, form and
manner prescribed by chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code.
(e) Duties and Powers of Director.
1. The director shall have general supervision and control of all
activities, functions, and employees of the department of fish and
game, under the supervision and direction of the commission, and shall
enforce all the provisions of the laws of the state, and rules and
proclamations of the commission relating to wild animals, birds, and
fish and, further, shall perform all the duties prescribed by section
67-2405, Idaho Code, and other laws of the state not inconsistent with
this act, and shall exercise all necessary powers incident thereto not
specifically conferred on the commission.
2. The director is hereby authorized to appoint as many classified em-
ployees as the commission may deem necessary to perform administrative
duties, to enforce the laws and to properly implement management, prop-
agation, and protection programs established for carrying out the pur-
poses of the Idaho fish and game code.
3. The appointment of such employees shall be made by the director in
accordance with chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated
pursuant thereto, and they shall be compensated as provided therein.
Said employees shall be bonded to the state of Idaho in the time, form,
and manner prescribed by chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code.
4. The director is hereby authorized to establish and maintain fish
hatcheries for the purpose of hatching, propagating, and distributing
all kinds of fish.
5.(A) The director, or any person appointed by him in writing to
do so, may take wildlife of any kind, dead or alive, or import the


same, subject to such conditions, restrictions and rules as he may
provide, for the purpose of inspection, cultivation, propagation,
distribution, scientific or other purposes deemed by him to be of
interest to the fish and game resources of the state.
(B) The director shall have supervision over all of the matters
pertaining to the inspection, cultivation, propagation and dis-
tribution of the wildlife propagated under the provisions of ti-
tle 36, Idaho Code. He shall also have the power and authority to
obtain, by purchase or otherwise, wildlife of any kind or variety
which he may deem most suitable for distribution in the state and
may have the same properly cared for and distributed throughout
the state of Idaho as he may deem necessary.
(C) The director is hereby authorized to issue a license/tag/per-
mit to a nonresident landowner who resides in a contiguous state
for the purpose of taking one (1) animal during an emergency depre-
dation hunt which includes the landowner's Idaho property subject
to such conditions, restrictions or rules as the director may pro-
vide. The fee for this license/tag/permit shall be equal to the
costs of a resident hunting license, a resident tag fee and a resi-
dent depredation permit.
(D) Unless relocation is required pursuant to subparagraph (E)
herein, notwithstanding the provisions of section 36-408, Idaho
Code, to the contrary, the director shall not expend any funds, or
take any action, or authorize any employee or agent of the depart-
ment or other person to take any action, to undertake actual trans-
plants of bighorn sheep into areas they do not now inhabit for the
purpose of augmenting existing populations until:
(i) The boards of county commissioners of the counties in
which the release is proposed to take place have been given
reasonable notice of the proposed release.
(ii) The affected federal and state land grazing permittees
and owners or leaseholders of private land in or contiguous
to the proposed release site have been given reasonable no-
tice of the proposed release.
(iii) The president pro tempore of the senate and the speaker
of the house of representatives have received from the di-
rector a plan for the forthcoming year that details, to the
best of the department's ability, the proposed transplants
which shall include the estimated numbers of bighorn sheep
to be transplanted and a description of the areas the pro-
posed transplant or transplants are planned for.
Upon request, the department shall grant one (1) hearing per
transplant or relocation if any affected individual or entity
expresses written concern within ten (10) days of notification re-
garding any transplants or relocations of bighorn sheep and shall
take into consideration these concerns in approving, modifying or
canceling any proposed bighorn sheep transplant or relocation.
Any such hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days of the re-
quest. It is the policy of the state of Idaho that existing sheep
or livestock operations in the area of any bighorn sheep trans-


plant or relocation are recognized and that the potential risk,
if any, of disease transmission and loss of bighorn sheep when the
same invade domestic livestock or sheep operations is accepted.
Prior to any transplant or relocation of bighorn sheep into ar-
eas they do not now inhabit or a transplant or relocation for the
purpose of augmenting existing populations, the department shall
provide for any affected federal or state land grazing permittees
or owners or leaseholders of private land a written agreement
signed by all federal, state and private entities responsible for
the transplant or relocation stating that the existing sheep or
livestock operations in the area of any such bighorn sheep trans-
plant or relocation are recognized and that the potential risk,
if any, of disease transmission and loss of bighorn sheep when the
same invade domestic livestock or sheep operations is accepted.
(E) The Idaho department of fish and game: (1) shall develop a
state management plan to maintain a viable, self-sustaining pop-
ulation of bighorn sheep in Idaho which shall consider as part
of the plan the current federal or state domestic sheep grazing
allotment(s) that currently have any bighorn sheep upon or in
proximity to the allotment(s); (2) within ninety (90) days of the
effective date of this act will cooperatively develop best manage-
ment practices with the permittee(s) on the allotment(s). Upon
commencement of the implementation of best management practices,
the director shall certify that the risk of disease transmission,
if any, between bighorn and domestic sheep is acceptable for the
viability of the bighorn sheep. The director's certification
shall continue for as long as the best management practices are
implemented. The director may also certify that the risk of dis-
ease transmission, if any, between bighorn and domestic sheep
is acceptable for the viability of the bighorn sheep based upon
a finding that other factors exist, including but not limited
to previous exposure to pathogens that make separation between
bighorn and domestic sheep unnecessary.
6.(A) The director shall have the power, at any time when it is
desired to introduce any new species, or if at any time any species
of wildlife of the state of Idaho shall be threatened with exces-
sive shooting, trapping, or angling or otherwise, to close any
open season or to reduce the bag limit or possession limit for such
species for such time as he may designate; in the event an emer-
gency is declared to exist, such closure shall become effective
forthwith upon written order of the director; in all other cases,
upon publication and posting as provided in section 36-105, Idaho
Code.
(B)(i) In order to protect property from damage by wildlife,
including bear and turkey, the fish and game commission
may delegate to the director or his designee the authority
to declare an open season upon that particular species of
wildlife to reduce its population. The director or his de-
signee shall make an order embodying his findings in respect
to when, under what circumstances, in which localities, by


what means, and in what amounts, numbers and sex the wildlife
subject to the hunt may be taken. In the event an emergency
is declared to exist, such open season shall become effec-
tive forthwith upon written order of the director or his
designee; in all other cases, upon publication and posting
as provided in section 36-105, Idaho Code.
(ii) In the event a kill permit is issued by the director
or his designee, the individual or landowner with the kill
permit, in conjunction with their responsibility for field
dressing the animals taken, may keep one (1) animal for their
personal use. In the event the director or his designee
issues a subsequent kill permit for the same individual or
landowner due to continued depredation, the director or his
designee may authorize the individual or landowner to keep a
second subsequently taken animal for their personal use.
(C) Any season closure order issued under authority hereof shall
be published in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation
in the area affected by the order for at least once a week for two
(2) consecutive weeks, and such order shall be posted in public
places in each county as the director may direct.
(D) During the closure of any open season or the opening of any
special depredation season by the director, all provisions of laws
relating to the closed season or the special depredation season
on such wildlife shall be in force and whoever violates any of the
provisions shall be subject to the penalties prescribed therefor.
(E) Prior to the opening of any special depredation hunt, the di-
rector or his designee shall be authorized to provide up to a max-
imum of fifty percent (50%) of the available permits for such big
game to the landholder(s) of privately owned land within the hunt
area or his designees. If the landholder(s) chooses to designate
hunters, he must provide a written list of the names of designated
individuals to the department. If the landholder(s) fails to des-
ignate licensed hunters, then the department will issue the total
available permits in the manner set by rule. All hunters must have
a current hunting license and shall have equal access to both pub-
lic and private lands within the hunt boundaries. It shall be un-
lawful for any landholder(s) to receive any form of compensation
from a person who obtains or uses a depredation controlled hunt
permit.
7. The director shall make an annual report to the governor, the legis-
lature, and the secretary of state of the doings and conditions of his
office.
8. The director may sell or cause to be sold publications and materials
in accordance with section 59-1012, Idaho Code.
9. Any deer, elk, antelope, moose, bighorn sheep or bison imported or
transported by the department of fish and game shall be tested for the
presence of certain communicable diseases that can be transmitted to
domestic livestock. Those communicable diseases to be tested for shall
be arrived at by mutual agreement between the department of fish and
game and the department of agriculture. Any moneys expended by the de-


partment of fish and game on wildlife disease research shall be mutually
agreed upon by the department of fish and game and the department of
agriculture.
In addition, a comprehensive animal health program for all deer, elk,
antelope, moose, bighorn sheep, or bison imported into, transported, or
resident within the state of Idaho shall be implemented after said pro-
gram is mutually agreed upon by the department of fish and game and the
department of agriculture.
10. In order to monitor and evaluate the disease status of wildlife and
to protect Idaho's livestock resources, any suspicion by fish and game
personnel of a potential communicable disease process in wildlife shall
be reported within twenty-four (24) hours to the department of agricul-
ture. All samples collected for disease monitoring or disease evalu-
ation of wildlife shall be submitted to the division of animal indus-
tries, department of agriculture.
11.(A) The director is authorized to enter into an agreement with
an independent contractor for the purpose of providing a telephone
order and credit card payment service for controlled hunt permits,
licenses, tags, and permits.
(B) The contractor may collect a fee for its service in an amount
to be set by contract.
(C) All moneys collected for the telephone orders of such li-
censes, tags, and permits shall be and remain the property of the
state, and such moneys shall be directly deposited by the con-
tractor into the state treasurer's account in accordance with the
provisions of section 59-1014, Idaho Code. The contractor shall
furnish a good and sufficient surety bond to the state of Idaho in
an amount sufficient to cover the amount of the telephone orders
and potential refunds.
(D) The refund of moneys for unsuccessful controlled hunt permit
applications and licenses, tags, and permits approved by the de-
partment may be made by the contractor crediting the applicant's
or licensee's credit card account.
12. The director may define activities or facilities that primarily
provide a benefit: to the department; to a person; for personal use; to
a commercial enterprise; or for a commercial purpose.
13. The director shall consult with other agencies to identify eligible
land suitable for the location or relocation of shooting ranges.
SECTION 4. That Section 40-503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-503. OFFICES -- APPOINTMENT -- TERM -- QUALIFICATIONS -- COMPENSA-
TION. (1) An office of the director of the Idaho transportation department is
established, and, pursuant to the provisions of section 59-904, Idaho Code,
the board governor shall appoint a director having knowledge and experience
in transportation matters. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the
board. A director appointed on or before July 1, 2025, shall be considered
for confirmation by the senate at the second regular session of the sixty-
eighth Idaho legislature. The director shall be appointed for a term of four
(4) years. The director shall not hold any other public office, nor any of-


fice in any political committee or organization, and shall devote full time
to the performance of his official duties. The director shall receive com-
pensation as the board may determine and shall be reimbursed for all actual
and necessary travel and expenses incurred by him in the discharge of his of-
ficial duties, not to exceed a sum approved by the board. Subject to the ap-
proval of the board, the director shall appoint a chief engineer of the de-
partment who shall serve at the pleasure of the director and the board, and
who shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) An office of the chief engineer of the department is established,
and the chief engineer shall be a registered professional engineer, hold-
ing a current certificate of registration in accordance with the laws of this
state, or who, having those qualifications shall within nine (9) months af-
ter his appointment, qualify as a registered professional engineer in accor-
dance with the laws of Idaho. The chief engineer shall also have had five
(5) years of actual experience in highway engineering, at least three (3) of
which shall have been in an administrative capacity involving the direction
of a substantial technical engineering staff. The chief engineer shall not
hold any other public office, nor any office in any political committee or
organization, and shall devote full time to the performance of his official
duties under the control and direction of the director. The chief engineer
shall receive compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as may
be established by the director.
SECTION 5. That Section 58-105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
58-105. DIRECTOR. The department of lands shall have an officer at its
head who shall be known as the director, who shall, and who shall be appointed
to a term of four (4) years. A director appointed on or before July 1, 2025,
shall be considered for confirmation by the senate at the second regular ses-
sion of the sixty-eighth Idaho legislature. The director shall be subject
to the general regulation and control of the state board of land commission-
ers, exercise the powers and discharge the duties vested by law in him or in
his department. The director may administer and certify oaths. With the
approval of the state board of land commissioners, the director shall pro-
vide for the organization of the department, its subordinate divisions and
the administrators thereof, the hiring of assistants, clerks or other pro-
fessional personnel pursuant to chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code, and shall
apportion the duties between such divisions or personnel as he may deem nec-
essary to the conduct of the business of the department. The director shall
promulgate such rules and regulations, subject to the approval of the board
of land commissioners, as will assure the effective administration of the
department and implementation of the directives of the state board of land
commissioners.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-4222, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4222. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD -- APPOINTMENT OF DIRECTOR -- TERM
-- EMPLOYEES -- MERIT SYSTEM -- SALARIES. (a) The park and recreation board
shall administer, conduct and supervise the department of parks and recre-


ation and shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation, including
the right to sue and be sued in its own name.
(b) The board Pursuant to the provisions of section 59-904, Idaho Code,
the governor shall appoint a director to serve at its discretion. for a term
of four (4) years. A director appointed on or before July 1, 2025, shall be
considered for confirmation by the senate at the second regular session of
the sixty-eighth Idaho legislature. When appointed, the director shall be
an ex officio member of the board and its secretary and administrative offi-
cer. He shall be bonded as required by the board and shall perform such du-
ties as are in this act presented and as are delegated by the board. The di-
rector shall be selected upon the basis of executive ability, experience and
training in park and recreational matters.
(c) The board shall authorize the employment of whatever staff it deems
necessary for sound and economical administration of the department. The
board shall adopt a merit system for all employees of the department. The
director shall hire said persons who shall hold their respective positions
subject to the rules of the merit system of the department. If a merit system
is adopted for state employees, then the employees of the department shall be
subject to the rules of such state merit system. The salaries and compensa-
tion of all persons employed by the department shall be fixed by the board and
as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.